Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB128.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Online Curriculum Availability.--(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter, a school entity shall post an Internet link or title for every textbook used by the school entity, a course syllabus or a written summary of each instructional course and the State academic standards for each instructional course offered by the school entity on its publicly accessible Internet website. The information shall be updated no later than thirty (30) business days after each time the list of textbooks, <--1234567891011121314151617181920 syllabi, course descriptions or State academic standards used by the school entity is revised. (b) The chief school administrator or a designee shall be responsible for implementing the requirements under subsection (a).(c) In no case shall the requirements of this section be construed to require a school entity to violate the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property right of the creator or owner of the curriculum.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chief school administrator." The superintendent of a school district, administrative director of an area career and technical school, executive director of an intermediate unit or chief executive officer of a charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0128PN1527 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021